apertium-tur.tur.lexc
!!%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
!!%<v%>%<iv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
!!%<v%>%<iv%>: JUSSIVE ;
!!%<v%>%<iv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
!!%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
!!%<v%>%<iv%>: DOUBLE-EVIDENTIAL ;
!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON TIT 

%<title%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON SYM-HASH

%<sym%>%<hash%>: # ;

LEXICON SYM-HASH-TAG

<[ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v | w | x | y | z ]+>  SYM-HASH ;

LEXICON SYM

%<sym%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Stem lexica
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous 

! FIXME: give the proper continuation lexicon

mı%<qst%>:mı V-MI-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
mı%<qst%>:mi V-MI-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
mı%<qst%>:mu V-MI-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
mı%<qst%>:mü V-MI-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
mı%<qst%>:%~mı V-MI-COMMON ; ! Dir/RL
%~:%~ # ; ! Dir/RL

i%<cop%>%<ifi%>:i%>%{D%}%{I%} V-COP-IFI-PERS ; ! For when it goes separately
i%<cop%>%<dub%>%<aor%>:i%>m%{I%}ş V-COP-PERS ; ! For when it goes separately
i%<cop%>%<gna_ken%>:iken # ;  ! For when it goes separately
i%<vaux%>%<ifi%>:i%>%{D%}%{I%} V-COP-IFI-PERS ; ! For when it goes separately
i%<vaux%>%<dub%>%<aor%>:i%>m%{I%}ş V-COP-PERS ; ! For when it goes separately
i%<vaux%>%<gna_ken%>:iken # ;  ! For when it goes separately

LEXICON Postadverbs

ise:ise POSTADV ;

da%<postadv%>:da # ; ! Dir/LR
da%<postadv%>:de # ; ! Dir/LR
da%<postadv%>:%da # ; ! Dir/RL

LEXICON Pronouns

PRON-PERS ; 

kendi:kendi PRON-PERS ; !
bir:bir PRON-PERS ; !
ikisi:ikisi PRON-PERS ; !
birbir:birbir PRON-PERS ; !

PRON-ITG ; 

bu:bu PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"
şu:şu PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"
o:o PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"

başka:başka PRON-IND ; ! "other"
nerde:nerde PRON-IND ;
hangi:hangi PRON-IND ;
birşey:birşey PRON-IND ;
hiçbir% şey:hiçbir% şey PRON-PERS ; !



hiçbir% şey:hiçbirşey PRON-NEG ; ! "nothing" ! Dir/LR
hiçbir% şey:hiç% birşey PRON-NEG ; ! "nothing" ! Dir/LR
hiçbir% şey:hiçbir% şey PRON-NEG ; ! "nothing"
hiç% kimse:hiç% kimse PRON-NEG ; ! "nobody"
hiçbir% zaman:hiç% zaman PRON-NEG ; ! "never"
herkes:herkes PRON-QNT ; ! "everybody"
her% bir:her% bir PRON-QNT ; !
hiçbir:hiçbir PRON-QNT ; !
iki:iki PRON-QNT ; !
ekseri:ekser PRON-QNT ; ! ""
hiç:hiç PRON-QNT ; !
biri:biri PRON-PERS ; 
bütün:bütün PRON-IND ; ! "every"
biri:biri PRON-IND ; 
hep:hep PRON-QNT ; ! "all" @@@@ TAKES CASES
kimse:kimse PRON-QNT ; ! "nobody"
birisi:birisi PRON-QNT ; ! "somebody"
birisi:birisi PRON-PERS ; ! "somebody"
bazıları:bazıları PRON-QNT ; ! "some of them"
çoğu:çoğ%>%{s%}%{I%} PRON-QNT-ÇOĞU ; ! ""
bazı:bazı PRON-QNT ; !

birbiri:birbir PRON-RECIP ; ! "each other" 
öz:öz PRON-REF ; ! "self"
kendi:kendi PRON-REF ; ! "self"

ora:ora PRON-ADV ; 
bura:bura PRON-ADV ; 
şura:şura PRON-ADV ; 
o% taraf:o% taraf PRON-ADV ;

LEXICON Titles

Profesör:Profesör TIT ; ! ""


LEXICON BARB  ! Dir/RL

%<barb%>: # ;  ! Dir/RL

LEXICON Symbols 


:%# SYM-HASH-TAG ; 

°C:°C SYM ; 
%%:%% SYM ; 
yüzde:%% SYM ; ! Dir/RL
!yüzde:yüzde SYM ; 

<(a|á|à|ă|â|ǎ|ä|ā|æ|b|c|ć|č|ç|d|e|é|è|ê|ě|ë|ə|f|g|ğ|h|i|í|ì|ǐ|ï|ī|ı|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|o|ó|ò|ộ|ǒ|ö|ø|ō|p|q|r|s|ŝ|š|ş|t|ţ|u|ú|ù|û|ǔ|ü|ū|v|w|x|y|ý|z)+> BARB ; ! Dir/RL

LEXICON Abbreviations

vs%.%<abbr%>:vs%. # ;
MÖ%<abbr%>:MÖ # ;
ğ%<abbr%>:ğ # ;
Dr:Dr ABBR ; ! ""
SSR:SSR ABBR ; !
BMT:BMT ABBR ; !
mm:mm ABBR ; ! ""
kg:kg ABBR ; ! ""
km:km ABBR ; ! ""
cm:cm ABBR ; ! ""
vb:vb ABBR ; ! ""
bkz:bkz ABBR ; !

A%.:A%. ABBR ; ! ""
B%.:B%. ABBR ; ! ""
P%.:P%. ABBR ; ! ""
V%.:V%. ABBR ; ! ""
G%.:G%. ABBR ; ! ""
Ğ%.:Ğ%. ABBR ; ! ""
D%.:D%. ABBR ; ! ""
E%.:E%. ABBR ; ! ""
J%.:J%. ABBR ; ! ""
Z%.:Z%. ABBR ; ! ""
I%.:I%. ABBR ; ! ""
K%.:K%. ABBR ; ! ""
Q%.:Q%. ABBR ; ! ""
L%.:L%. ABBR ; ! ""
M%.:M%. ABBR ; ! ""
N%.:N%. ABBR ; ! ""
O%.:O%. ABBR ; ! ""
P%.:P%. ABBR ; ! ""
R%.:R%. ABBR ; ! ""
S%.:S%. ABBR ; ! ""
T%.:T%. ABBR ; ! ""
U%.:U%. ABBR ; ! ""
F%.:F%. ABBR ; ! ""
H%.:H%. ABBR ; ! ""
C%.:C%. ABBR ; ! ""
Ç%.:Ç%. ABBR ; ! ""
Ş%.:Ş%. ABBR ; ! ""
Y%.:Y%. ABBR ; ! ""
Ü%.:Ü%. ABBR ; ! ""
Ä%.:Ä%. ABBR ; ! ""
m%/s:m%/s ABBR; 
cm:cm ABBR; 


LEXICON Punctuation

%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%.%.%<sent%>:%.%. # ;
%.%.%.%<sent%>:%.%.%. # ;
…%<sent%>:… # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%–%<guio%>:%– # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<quot%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%\%<sent%>:%\ # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;



!==============!
 LEXICON Digits ! Use/Circ
!==============!


%0:%0 NUM ;  ! Use/Circ
№:№ DIGITLEX ;  ! Use/Circ
DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT-REST ; ! Use/Circ

! FIXME: We probably need a flag diacritic here, or an alternative '<percent>' lexicon
%%:%% DIGITLEX ;  ! Use/Circ

LEXICON Postpositions
kıyasla:kıyasla POST ; !
kıyaslandığında:kıyaslandığında POST ; !
sırasında:sırasında POST ; !
yoluyla:yoluyla POST ; !
uğruna:uğruna POST ; !
aleyhine:aleyhine POST ;
misali:misali POST ; !
vs:vs POST ; !
aşkın:aşkın POST ; !
ziyade:ziyade POST ; !
yanında:yanında POST ; !
üstünde:üstünde POST ; !
karşısında:karşısında POST ; !
benzeyen:benzeyen POST ; !
yönünde:yönünde POST ; !
halinde:halinde POST ; ! "ın case of" ! FIXME
hakkında:hakkında POST ;
dahi:dahi POST ; !
ertesi:ertesi POST ; !
özgü:özgü POST ; !
gerek:gerek POST ; !
başka:başka POST ;
sonra:sonra POST ;
önce:önce POST ;
belki:belki POST ; !
olmadığı% için:olmadığı% için POST ; !
gibi:gibi POST ; ! ""
için:İçin POST ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
için:için POST ; ! ""
itibaren:itibaren POST ; ! "from x onward"
ile:İle POST ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
ile:ile POST ; ! ""
dair:dair POST ;
değin:değin POST ;
ile% ilgili:ile% ilgili POST ;
kadar:kadar POST ; ! ""
takdirde:takdirde POST ; ! "in case of" 
boyunca:boyunca POST ; ! "during"
haline:haline POST ; ! "into"
uyarınca:uyarınca POST; ! "according to"
kala:kala POST ; ! "til"
edici:edici POST ; ! @@@ really weird behaviour
dolu:dolu POST ; ! "for the/an entire" (e.g. "hayat dolu")
fazla:fazla POST ; !
ise:ise POST ; !
karşın:karşın POST ; !
evvel:evvel POST ; ! ""
yakın:yakın POST ;
aracılığıyla:aracılığıyla POST ; !
ardından:ardından POST ; ! ""
aleyhinde:aleyhinde POST ; ! "against" @@@ALSO NOM
doğru:doğru POST ; ! ""
göre:göre POST ; ! ""
kadar:kadar POST ; ! ""
karşı:karşı POST ; ! ""
rağmen:rağmen POST ; ! ""
ait:ait POST ; ! ""
dek:dek POST ; ! "until"
aykırı:aykırı POST ; ! "against"
mensup:mensup POST ; ! "concerned with, belonging to"
başka:başka POST ; ! ""
beri:beri POST ; ! ""
dolayı:dolayı POST ; ! ""
ötürü:ötürü POST ; ! ""
ibibaren:ibibaren POST ; ! ""
önce:önce POST ; ! ""
sonra:sonra POST ; ! ""
yana:yana POST ; ! ""
olarak:olarak POST ;
ilgili:ilgili POST ; ! "regarding"
İlgili:İlgili POST ; ! "" ! Dir/RL ! Use/MT
hariç:hariç POST ; ! "besides"
üzere:üzere POST ; ! "besides"
olmaksızın:olmaksızın POST ;
LEXICON Determiners
bu:bu DET-DEM ; ! "this"
şu:şu DET-DEM ; ! "this"
o:o DET-DEM ; ! "this"
işte% bu:işte% bu DET-DEM ; !
işte:işte DET-DEM ; !
işbu:işbu DET-DEM ; !
birçok:birçok DET-QNT ;
hep:hep DET-QNT ; ! "all" @@@@ TAKES CASES
hepsi:hepsi DET-QNT ; !
bütün:bütün DET-QNT ; ! "every"
kaç:kaç DET-QNT ; ! ""
her% bir:her% bir DET-QNT ; !
bir:bir DET-IND ; ! "a, one"
başka:başka DET-IND ; ! "other"
birkaç:birkaç DET-IND ; ! "some"
böyle:böyle DET-IND ; 
şöyle:şöyle DET-IND ; 
öyle:öyle DET-IND ; 
dim:dim DET-IND ;
hiçbir:hiçbir DET-NEG ; ! ""
kendi:kendi DET-REF ; ! ""
birkaç% tane:birkaç% tane DET-QNT ; ! "some units"
birtakım:birtakım DET-QNT ; ! "several"
birçok:birçok DET-QNT ; ! "a lot of"
biraz:biraz DET-QNT ; ! "a bit"
bir% miktar:bir% miktar DET-QNT ; ! "some measures"
bazı:bazı DET-QNT ; ! "some"
kimi:kimi DET-QNT ; ! "some (people)"
bir% kısım:bir% kısım DET-QNT ; ! "some"
bu% kadar:bu% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "this much"
şu% kadar:şu% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "that much"
o% kadar:o% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "this much"
ne% kadar:ne% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "how much"
çok:çok DET-QNT ; ! "many"
çoğu:çoğu DET-QNT ; ! "many" 
hiçbir:hiçbir DET-QNT ; ! "nothing"
herbir:herbir DET-QNT ;
her:her DET-DEM ; ! "every"
bütün:bütün DET-DEM ; ! "the whole"
tüm:tüm DET-DEM ; ! "the whole"
aynı:aynı DET-DEM ; ! "the same"
öteki:öteki DET-DEM ; ! "the other"
öbür:öbür DET-DEM ; !  "the other"
tek:tek DET-IND ; ! "sole, single" 
herhangi:herhangi DET-IND ; ! "any"
herhangi% bir:herhangi% bir DET-IND ; ! "anyone"
ne% kadar:ne% kadar DET-ITG ; ! "how much"
hangi:hangi DET-ITG ; ! "which"
binlerce:binlerce DET-QNT ; ! "thousands of"
yüzlerce:yüzlerce DET-QNT ; ! "hundreds of"
düzinelerce:düzinelerce DET-QNT ; ! "dozens of"
milyonlarca:milyonlarca DET-QNT ; ! "millions of"
birer:birer DET-QNT ; ! "one each"
tümü:tümü DET-QNT ; ! "all of"
tüm:tüm DET-QNT ;
LEXICON Numerals
I:I NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
II:II NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
III:III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IV:IV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX:IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V:V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VI:VI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VII:VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VIII:VIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
X:X NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI:XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XII:XII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII:XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIV:XIV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIX:XIX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XV:XV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVI:XVI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII:XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVIII:XVIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XX:XX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI:XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXII:XXII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
LEXICON Nouns
İng:İng ABBR ; !
prof:prof ABBR ; !
m:m ABBR ; ! ""
LEXICON Interjections 
hop:hop INTERJ ; !
selam:selam INTERJ ; !
yeter:yeter INTERJ ; !
günaydın:günaydın INTERJ ; !
değil% mi% ki:değil% mi% ki INTERJ ; !
hâşâ:hâşâ INTERJ ; !
âmin:âmin INTERJ ; !
off:off INTERJ ; !
of:of INTERJ ; !
anladım:anladım INTERJ ; !
merhaba:merhaba INTERJ ; !
hülasa:hülasa INTERJ ; !
me:me INTERJ ; !
vah:vah INTERJ ; !
ta:ta INTERJ ; !
berbat:berbat INTERJ ; !
löp:löp INTERJ ; !
ley:ley INTERJ ; !
hu:hu INTERJ ; ! "hey"
be:be INTERJ ; !
esselamu:esselamu INTERJ ; !
her% neyse:her% neyse INTERJ ; !
radıyullahu:radıyullahu INTERJ ; !
Allahu% Ekber:Allahu% Ekber INTERJ ; !
öh:öh INTERJ ; !
mesela:mesela INTERJ ; !
falan:falan INTERJ ; !
falan% fistan:falan% fistan INTERJ ;
hü:hü INTERJ ; !
olsun:olsun INTERJ ; !
hayda:hayda INTERJ ; !
yahu:yahu INTERJ ; !
yazık:yazık INTERJ ; !
var:var INTERJ ; !
peki:peki INTERJ ; !
bakınız:bakınız INTERJ ; !
teala:teala INTERJ ; !
inşallah:inşallah INTERJ ; !
hey:hey INTERJ ; !
hahaha:hahaha INTERJ ; !
ha:ha INTERJ ; !
acaba:acaba INTERJ ; !
ah:ah INTERJ ; !
çip:çip INTERJ ; !
la:la INTERJ ; !
rahmanullah:rahmanullah INTERJ ; !
vesselam:vesselam INTERJ ; !
aleyküm:aleyküm INTERJ ; !
sallallahu:sallallahu INTERJ ; !
radiyullahu:radiyullahu INTERJ ; !
enhu:enhu INTERJ ; !
radıyallahu% anh:radıyallahu% anh INTERJ ; !
hadi:hadi INTERJ ; !
amin:amin INTERJ ; !
vay:vay INTERJ ; !
ey:ey INTERJ ; !
şah% mat:şah% mat INTERJ ; !
evet:evet INTERJ ; ! "yes"
lütfen:lütfen INTERJ ; ! ""
yok:yok INTERJ ; ! ""
yani:yani INTERJ ; ! ""
hayır:hayır INTERJ ; ! "no"
tabii% ki:tabii% ki INTERJ ;  ! "of course"
tabii% ki:tabi% ki INTERJ ;  ! "of course" ! Dir/LR
tabii% ki:tabî% ki INTERJ ;  ! "of course" ! Dir/LR
tamam:tamam INTERJ ; ! ""
hoş% geldiniz:hoş% geldiniz INTERJ ; ! ""
en% azından:en% azından INTERJ ; ! ""
oh:oh INTERJ ;
e:e INTERJ ;
yo:yo INTERJ ;
teşekkürler:teşekkürler INTERJ ;
